Utah statutes.
67-1a-7.   Use and custody of great seal.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the lieutenant governor, or the lieutenant governor's designee, is authorized to use or affix the Great Seal of this state to any document whatever and only in pursuance of law, and is responsible for its safekeeping. Any person who illegally uses the Great Seal of this state, or such seal when defaced, is guilty of a felony.

